Connecticut, session 2026, SB00284.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 29-453a of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) Any privately owned multifamily housing project, within a
4 municipality with a population of at least one hundred thirty thousand
5 but less than one hundred [thirty-five] forty thousand, shall install and
6 maintain one or more emergency power generators capable of
7 providing a minimum of four to twelve hours of sufficient electrical
8 power to (1) each unit for heating, water, lighting and critical medical
9 equipment, and (2) each passenger elevator.
10 (b) For purposes of this section, "privately owned multifamily
11 housing project" means real property that (1) consists of, or
12 encompasses, a building not less than fifteen stories in height that
SB284 / File No. 77 1

SB284 File No. 77
13 contains dwelling units whose occupancy is restricted by age, and (2) is
14 subject, in whole or in part, to a mortgage insured under the National
15 Housing Act, 12 USC 1701 et seq.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-453a
AGE Joint Favorable
SB284 / File No. 77 2

SB284 File No. 77
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which adjusts the requirements for which multifamily
housing projects must have at least one emergency power generator,
does not result in a fiscal impact to the state or to municipalities as this
only concerns private parties.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB284 / File No. 77 3

SB284 File No. 77
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 284
AN ACT CONCERNING EMERGENCY POWER GENERATOR
REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN MULTIFAMILY HOUSING
PROJECTS.